it: Classe di stabilità: Sovrastabile; Stabile; Sottostabile; Altro
ru: Класс стабильности: Перестабильный; Стабильный; Недостабильный; Другое
vi: Lớp ổn định: Overstable; Stable; Understable; Khác
el: Κατηγορία σταθερότητας: Υπερσταθερό; Σταθερό; Υποσταθερό; Άλλο
nl: Stabiliteitsklasse: Overstabiel; Stabiel; Onderstabiel; Overige
fi: Vakausluokka: Ylivakaa; Vakaa; Alivakaa; Muu
da: Stabilitetsklasse: Overstabil; Stabil; Understabil; Andet
bg-BG: Клас на стабилност: Свръхстабилен; Стабилен; По-малко стабилен; Друго
fr: Classe de stabilité: Surstable; Stable; Sous-stable; Autre
sv: Stabilitetsklass: Överstabil; Stabil; Understabil; Övrigt
ro-RO: Clasa de stabilitate: Foarte stabil; Stabil; Sub-stabil; Altele
sl-SI: Razred stabilnosti: Prestabilen; Stabilen; Podstabilen; Drugo
es: Clase de estabilidad: Sobreestable; Estable; Subestable; Otro
tr: Stabilite sınıfı: Aşırı stabil; Stabil; Az stabil; Diğer
lt-LT: Stabilumo klasė: Itin stabilus; Stabilus; Mažo stabilumo; Kita
hu: Stabilitási osztály: Túl stabil (Overstable); Stabil; Kevésbé stabil (Understable); Egyéb
th: ระดับความเสถียร: โอเวอร์สเตเบิล; เสถียร; อันเดอร์สเตเบิล; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Estabilidade classe: Sobreestável; Estável; Subestável; Outro
nb: Stabilitetsklasse: Overstabil; Stabil; Understabil; Annet
sk-SK: Trieda stability: Overstable; Stabilné; Understable; Iné
hr-HR: Razred stabilnosti: Overstable; Stabilno; Understable; Ostalo
zh-TW: 穩定性級別: 過度穩定; 穩定; 偏弱穩定; 其他
pt-PT: Classe de estabilidade: Sobre-estável; Estável; Subestável; Outro
en: Stability class: Overstable; Stable; Understable; Other
zh-CN: 稳定性等级: 过度稳定; 稳定; 欠稳定; 其他
de: Stabilitätsklasse: Überstabil; Stabil; Unterstabil; Sonstige
ko: 안정성 등급: 오버스테이블; 스테이블; 언더스테이블; 기타
pl: Klasa stabilności: Nadstabilne (Overstable); Stabilne; Podstabilne (Understable); Inne
ja: 安定性クラス: オーバーステーブル; ステーブル; アンダーステーブル; その他
cs: Třída stability: Přestabilizovaný; Stabilní; Podstabilizovaný; Jiné